Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.12.047

Removal of a director, officer, or employee of a bank or holding company—Violation of final order—Penalty.

Any present or former director, officer, or employee of a bank or holding company, or any other person against whom there is outstanding an effective final order served upon the person and who participates in any manner in the conduct of the affairs of the bank or holding company involved; or who directly or indirectly solicits or procures, transfers or attempts to transfer, or votes or attempts to vote any proxies, consents, or authorizations with respect to any voting rights in the bank or holding company; or who, without the prior approval of the director, votes for a director or serves or acts as a director, officer, employee, or agent of any bank or holding company shall upon conviction for a violation of any order, be guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable as prescribed under chapter 9A.20 RCW, as now or hereafter amended.

[ 2014 c 37 s 178; 2010 c 88 s 24; 1994 c 92 s 67; 1977 ex.s. c 178 s 10. Formerly RCW 30.12.047.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 88: See RCW 32.50.900.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 178: See note following RCW 30A.04.450.